Utah statutes.
38-10-104.   Limitation of interests covered by lien.

(1)  If work is performed or materials or equipment are furnished to the owner of less than a fee interest, the lien granted by this chapter does not extend to the underlying fee interest, royalty interest, overriding royalty, net profits interest, production payment, or other nonpossessory interest, unless expressly provided for by contract with the owner of the nonpossessory interest.

(2)  If work is performed for or materials or equipment furnished to an owner or part owner of only a portion of the acreage within the production unit, the lien granted by this chapter is limited to that portion of acreage.

